Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 5. Contributions by Employers.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.

Sec. 39.35.250.
Calculation of employer’s contribution rate; deposit of contributions. [Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 39.35.255.
Contributions by employers.

Each employer, except as provided in (h) of this section, shall contribute to the system every payroll period an amount calculated by applying a rate of 22 percent of the greater of the total of all base salaries

paid by the employer to employees who are active members of the system, including any adjustments to contributions required by AS

39.35.520

; or

paid by the employer to employees who were active members of the system during the corresponding payroll period for the fiscal year ending

June 30, 2008; or

June 30, 2012, if that total is less than the total under (A) of this paragraph, and the employer is a municipality in which the population decreased by more than 25 percent between 2000 and 2010, according to the decennial census conducted by the United States Bureau of the Census.

The administrator shall allocate contributions received for full payment of

the actuarially determined employer normal cost for the plan; and

all contributions required by AS

39.30.370

and AS

39.35.750

for the fiscal year.

If, after allocation of contributions under (b) of this section, a portion of the employer contributions remains, the administrator shall apply that remaining portion toward payment of the past service liability of the plan.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the annual employer contribution rate may not be less than the rate sufficient to allow payment of the employer normal cost and the employer contributions required under AS

39.30.370

and AS

39.35.750

.

An employer of a retired member rehired under AS

39.35.150

shall include that member’s base salary when calculating the contribution amount established in (a) of this section.

All or a portion of the employer’s share of any accrued actuarial liability to the plan may be prepaid in a lump sum. The commissioner may, by regulation, establish a minimum amount for the lump sum payment of a portion. The commissioner shall charge to the employer appropriate and reasonable costs to the plan attributable to a lump sum payment that are not greater than administrative costs applied to other employer contributions. If a lump sum payment is made, the payment shall be accounted for separately in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. The regulations must provide for crediting to each lump sum payment account all earnings and losses received from investment of that payment. The lump sum payment shall be used solely to offset contributions under this section required of the employer that made the payment or on whose behalf the payment was made, taking into account earnings and losses from its investment. A lump sum payment made by or on behalf of an employer under this subsection, together with all earnings and losses from investment of that payment, may not be considered in calculating that employer’s share of any discretionary payment authorized by the state that benefits multiple employers.

If all or a portion of the employer’s share of any accrued actuarial liability to the plan is prepaid in a lump sum under (f) of this section, the administrator shall calculate a revised employer contribution rate for that employer in recognition of that prepayment not more than 30 days following the prepayment.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the state as an employer shall contribute to the system every payroll period an amount sufficient to pay the actuarially determined employer normal cost, all contributions required under AS

39.30.370

and AS

39.35.750

, and past service cost for members at the contribution rate adopted by the board under AS

37.10.220

for the fiscal year for that payroll period.

In this section, “normal cost” means the cost of providing the benefits expected to be credited, with respect to service, to all active members of the plan during the year beginning after the last valuation date.

History.

(§ 11 ch 13 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 49 SLA 2018; am §§ 1, 2 ch 9 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (f) and (g) were enacted as AS 39.35.270(d) and (e) in sec. 12, ch. 35, SLA 2008 and renumbered in 2008, at which time an internal reference in subsection (g) was conformed and the subsection enacted as (f) was relettered as (h).

Subsection (h) was enacted as (i). Relettered in 2021, at which time former subsection (h) was relettered to subsection (i).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, added (a)(1)(B), and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, in (a), in the introductory language, inserted “, except as provided in (i) [now (h)] of this section,” following “Each employer”; added (i) [now (h)].

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 9, SLA 2021 (SB 55), which amended (a) and added (h) of this section, see 2021 Senate Journal 69 — 71.

Sec. 39.35.260.
Annual calculation. [Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 39.35.270.
Amount of employer’s contributions. [Repealed, § 24 ch 13 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 39.35.280.
Additional state contributions.

In addition to the contributions that the state is required to make under AS

39.35.255

as an employer, the state shall contribute to the plan each July 1 or, if funds are not available on July 1, as soon after July 1 as funds become available, an amount for the ensuing fiscal year that, when combined with the total employer contributions that the administrator estimates will be allocated under AS

39.35.255

(c), is sufficient to pay the plan’s past service liability at the contribution rate adopted by the board under AS

37.10.220

for that fiscal year.

History.

(§ 10 d ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 12 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Cross references. —

For protection of damage awards from reduction on account of contributions under this section, see AS

09.17.070(f)

.

Sec. 39.35.282.
Contributions for medical benefits.

Contributions made by an employer under AS

39.35.255

and

39.35.280

shall be separately computed for benefits provided by AS

39.35.535

and shall be deposited in the Alaska retiree health care trust established under AS

39.30.097(a)

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Sec. 39.35.285.
Employers of village public safety officers. [Repealed, § 30 ch 92 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 39.35.290.
Regulations governing transmittal of employer contributions.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations to ensure the orderly and efficient transmittal of employer contributions.

History.

(§ 10 e ch 143 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “commissioner” was substituted for “board” in this section.